core/server/Samples/MyProjects/GyroGears/layouts/default/ro_RO.aff
#********************************************************************************
# feminin
SFX r Y 37
SFX r ică ica ică                        s.f.sg.art.
SFX r ică ea ică                        s.f.sg.art.
SFX r ică ico ică
SFX r ică elei ică                         s.f.sg.dat.
SFX r ică ele ică                          s.f.pl.neart.
SFX r ică elele ică                        s.f.pl.dat.
SFX r ică elelor ică                       s.f.pl.dat.
SFX r șcă șca șcă                    s.f.sg.art
SFX r șcă șcao șcă
SFX r șcă ștei [^a]șcă                    s.f.sg.dat
SFX r șcă ște [^a]șcă                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX r șcă ștele [^a]șcă                    s.f.pl.art.
SFX r șcă ștelor [^a]șcă                    s.f.pl.dat.
SFX r așcă aștei [^e]așcă                    s.f.sg.dat
SFX r așcă aște [^e]așcă                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX r așcă aștele [^e]așcă                    s.f.pl.art.
SFX r așcă aștelor [^e]așcă                    s.f.pl.dat.
SFX r așcă ștei eașcă                    s.f.sg.dat
SFX r așcă ște eașcă                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX r așcă ștele eașcă                    s.f.pl.art.
SFX r așcă ștelor eașcă                    s.f.pl.dat.
SFX r ață ața ață                s.f.sg.art.
SFX r ață ațo ață
SFX r ață ței eață               s.f.sg.dat
SFX r ață țe  eață              s.f.pl.neart.
SFX r ață țele  eață              s.f.pl.art.
SFX r ață țelor eață              s.f.pl.dat.
SFX r ață eței [^e]ață               s.f.sg.dat
SFX r ață ețe  [^e]ață              s.f.pl.neart.
SFX r ață ețele  [^e]ață              s.f.pl.art.
SFX r ață ețelor  [^e]ață              s.f.pl.dat.
SFX r gă ga gă          s.f.sg.art
SFX r gă go gă
SFX r gă gii gă         s.f.sg.dat
SFX r gă gi gă          s.f.pl.neart.
SFX r gă gile gă          s.f.pl.art.
SFX r gă gilor gă          s.f.pl.dat.

SFX R Y 72
SFX R șcă șca șcă                    s.f.sg.art
SFX R șcă șcao șcă
SFX R șcă știi [^a]șcă                    s.f.sg.dat
SFX R șcă ști [^a]șcă                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R șcă știle [^a]șcă                    s.f.pl.art.
SFX R șcă știlor [^a]șcă                    s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R așcă ăștii [^e]așcă                    s.f.sg.dat
SFX R așcă ăști [^e]așcă                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R așcă ăștile [^e]așcă                    s.f.pl.art.
SFX R așcă ăștilor [^e]așcă                    s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R așcă știi eașcă                    s.f.sg.dat
SFX R așcă ști eașcă                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R așcă știle eașcă                    s.f.pl.art.
SFX R așcă știlor eașcă                    s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R ancă anca ancă              s.f.sg.art.
SFX R ancă anco ancă
SFX R ancă ncei [^i]ancă             s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R ancă nce [^i]ancă              s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R ancă ncele [^i]ancă            s.f.pl.art.
SFX R ancă ncelor [^i]ancă            s.f.pl.art.dat.
SFX R ancă encei iancă             s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R ancă ence iancă              s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R ancă encele iancă            s.f.pl.art.
SFX R ancă encelor iancă            s.f.pl.art.dat.
SFX R ană ana [^e]ană              s.f.sg.art.
SFX R ană ano [^e]ană
SFX R ană enei [^e]ană             s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R ană ene [^e]ană              s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R ană enele [^e]ană            s.f.pl.art.
SFX R ană enelor [^e]ană           s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R ană ana eană                  s.f.sg.art.
SFX R ană ano eană
SFX R ană nei eană                   s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R ană ne eană                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R ană nele eană                  s.f.pl.art.
SFX R ană nelor eană                 s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R ază aza ază                     s.f.sg.art
SFX R ază azo ază
SFX R ază ezei ază                    s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R ază eze ază                     s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R ază ezele ază                   s.f.pl.art.
SFX R ază ezelor ază                  s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R ască  asca ască               s.f.sg.art.
SFX R ască  asco ască
SFX R ască  ești ască                 s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R ască  eștii ască                s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R ască  eștile ască              s.f.pl.art.
SFX R ască  eștilor ască             s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R aie aia aie                       s.f.sg.art.
SFX R aie aio aie
SFX R aie ăii aie                        s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R aie ăi aie                         s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R aie ăile aie                       s.f.pl.art.
SFX R aie ăilor aie                      s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R ică ica ică                        s.f.sg.art.
SFX R ică ico ică
SFX R ică icii ică                         s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R ică ici ică                          s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R ică icile ică                        s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R ică icilor ică                       s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R ără ăra ără                         s.f.sg.art.
SFX R ără ăro ără
SFX R ără erei ără                         s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R ără ere ără                          s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R ără erele ără                        s.f.pl.art.
SFX R ără erelor ără                       s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R ă a [^rnzci]ă                         s.f.sg.art.
SFX R ă o [^rnzci]ă
SFX R ă e [^rnzci]ă                         s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R ă ei [^rnzci]ă                        s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R ă ele [^rnzci]ă                      s.f.pl.art.
SFX R ă elor [^rnzc]ă                      s.f.pl.dat.


SFX s Y 6
SFX s ică ica ică                        s.f.sg.art.
SFX s ică ico ică
SFX s ică icei ică                         s.f.sg.dat.
SFX s ică ice ică                          s.f.pl.neart.
SFX s ică icele ică                        s.f.pl.art.
SFX s ică icelor ică                       s.f.pl.dat.

SFX u Y 6
SFX u ică ica ică                        s.f.sg.art.
SFX u ică ico ică
SFX u ică elei ică                         s.f.sg.dat.
SFX u ică ele ică                          s.f.pl.neart.
SFX u ică elele ică                        s.f.pl.art.
SFX u ică elelor ică                       s.f.pl.dat.



#defect de singular
SFX a Y 2
SFX a   e     ele   e                  s.f.pl.art.
SFX a   e     elor  e                  s.f.pl.dat.
